Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1509
Operator's license services system; build and maintain; Operator's License Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall build and maintain a new operator's license services system for the issuance of operators' licenses and state identification cards. The Director of Motor Vehicles shall designate an implementation date for the new system which date is on or before July 1, 2032.

(2) The Operator's License Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund is created. The fund shall consist of amounts credited under section 60-483. The fund shall be used for the building, implementation, and maintenance of a new operator's license services system for the issuance of operators' licenses and state identification cards.

(3) Any money in the Operator's License Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 2021, LB106, § 2;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 20;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 53.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.